District of Columbia statutes.
7-2201

Declaration of intent; “civil defense” defined.

Because of the existing possibility of the occurrence of disaster of unprecedented destructiveness resulting from enemy attack, sabotage, or other hostile action, it is the intent of Congress that plans and programs to provide necessary protection, relief, and assistance for persons and property in the District of Columbia in the event such disaster shall occur or become imminent so as to require such protection, relief, and assistance, should be developed. As used in this chapter, the term “civil defense” shall mean all activities necessary for the development and execution of such plans and programs, unless the context indicates a different meaning.

Aug. 11, 1950, 64 Stat. 438, ch. 686, § 1
1981 Ed., § 6-1401.
1973 Ed., § 6-1201.